Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1670.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. State preemption; occupation; licensure; prohibition; definitions a. The licensure of persons subject to title 32, chapter 10 is of statewide concern. The licensure of persons subject to title 32, chapter 10 is not subject to further regulation by a municipality except as provided in this section. b. A municipality may not require a person to obtain a journeyman license if the person is subject to licensure pursuant to title 32, chapter 10. C. A municipality may require a person to be licensed and may issue a journeyman license for the following occupations: 1. Plumbing. 2. Pipe fitting. 3. mechanical trades. 4. HVAC installation. 5. Electrical or alarm system trades. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Licensure" means any training, education, test, certification, registration or license that is required for a person to perform an occupation in addition to any associated licensing fee. 2. "Occupation" means a paid job, profession, work, line of work, trade, employment, position, post, career, field, vocation or craft. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-269.31. State preemption; occupation; licensure; prohibition; definitions a. The licensure of persons subject to title 32, chapter 10 is of statewide concern. The licensure of persons subject to title 32, chapter 10 is not subject to further regulation by a county except as provided in this section. b. A County may not require a person to obtain a journeyman license if the person is subject to licensure pursuant to title 32, chapter 10. C. A county may require a person to be licensed and may issue a journeyman license for the following occupations: 1. Plumbing. 2. Pipe fitting. 3. mechanical trades. 4. HVAC installation. 5. Electrical or alarm system trades. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Licensure" means any training, education, test, certification, registration or license that is required for a person to perform an occupation in addition to any associated licensing fee. 2. "Occupation" means a paid job, profession, work, line of work, trade, employment, position, post, career, field, vocation or craft. END_STATUTE